Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 1 General Provisions

27-4-1.
Salt-water and fresh-water demarcation line.

The line established in this state as the separation point between salt waters and fresh waters for commercial fishing and sport fishing is as follows:

The point at which U.S. Highway 17 crosses the following bodies of water and their tributaries shall be the line of demarcation for them: St. Marys River, Satilla River, South Altamaha River, Champney River, Butler River, Darien River, Little Ogeechee System (except Salt Creek), North Newport River, Medway River, Big Ogeechee River, and the point at which Georgia Highway 25/South Carolina 170 crosses the Savannah River and its tributaries. All water seaward of these points shall be considered salt water; and

The following streams and their tributaries are designated as salt water for their entire length: Crooked River, Little Satilla River, South Brunswick River, Turtle River, Sapelo River, South Newport River, Salt Creek (Little Ogeechee System), and all other rivers, streams, and tributaries in the six coastal counties which are not enumerated in this subsection.

This Code section shall not apply to fresh-water ponds on the seaward side of the demarcation line.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-811, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1629, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 537, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 13; Ga. L. 2008, p. 163, § 1/HB 1016.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “St. Marys River” was substituted for “St. Mary’s River” in paragraph (a)(1).

27-4-2.
Fishing in waters or from lands of another without permission; obstruction or interference with rights of others.

It shall be unlawful for any person to fish in the waters or from upon the lands of another without first having obtained permission from the landowner or person in charge of such lands, provided that nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to apply to the fishing or taking of fish, other than oysters, clams, and other shellfish, in any of the salt-water creeks, streams, or estuaries leading from the Atlantic Ocean or from the sounds, rivers, or bays surrounding the several islands of this state. It shall also be unlawful for any person to obstruct or interfere with the right of any other person to fish in these salt-water creeks, streams, or estuaries leading from the Atlantic Ocean or from the sounds, rivers, or bays surrounding the several islands of this state. Game wardens, sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, and all other peace officers of this state or of any county or municipality thereof shall enforce this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 7; Code 1933, § 45-513; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 81; Ga. L. 1972, p. 200, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-701, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Game wardens” for “Conservation rangers” at the beginning of the last sentence.

Cross references.

Criminal trespass generally, §

16-7-21

.

Limitation of liability of owners of property used for recreational purposes, § 51-3-20 et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “Public Rights in Georgia’s Tidelands,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 79 (1974).

27-4-3.
Right to take shellfish from stream or estuary.

Reserved.
Repealed by Ga. L. 1991, p. 693, § 2, effective July 1, 1991.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1952, p. 247, §§ 1-6; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 90; Code 1933, § 45-704, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8.

27-4-4.
Unlawful dumping; recovery of damages.

It shall be unlawful for any person to throw, dump, drain, or allow to pass into any waters of this state which belong to the department or which are being utilized by the department for fish propagation any sawdust, dyestuff, oil, chemicals, or other deleterious substances that will or may tend to injure, destroy, or drive away from such waters any fish or aquatic organisms which may inhabit such waters.

The state, through the department, may recover damages in a civil action against any person who unlawfully or negligently injures or destroys any fish or aquatic organism in any waters which belong to the department or which are being utilized by the department for fish propagation. The measure of damages in such action shall be the amount which will compensate for all the detriment proximately caused by the destruction or injury of such fish or aquatic organism.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 22; Code 1933, § 45-702, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-4-5.
Methods for taking fish generally.

It shall be unlawful to fish for game fish, except American shad, hickory shad, flathead catfish, and channel catfish, by any means other than a pole and line. Except as otherwise provided, it shall be unlawful to take any fish in the fresh waters of this state by any method other than a pole and line, sport trotlines in accordance with Code Section 27-4-32, set hooks, jugs, bow and arrow in accordance with Code Section 27-4-34, spears in accordance with Code Section 27-4-33, minnow seines and minnow traps in accordance with Code Section 27-4-6, by hand in accordance with Code Section 27-4-37, and as authorized in Code Section 27-4-91 with regard to commercial fresh-water fishing.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, dip nets and cast nets may be used to take for bait threadfin shad, blueback herring, gizzard shad, and other nongame fish as authorized by the board; and landing nets may be used to land fish legally caught.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, it shall be lawful to use seines, nets, and chemicals in a pond if all the owners of a pond desire that such be done and if a local game warden is notified at least two hours in advance of the use, provided that it shall not be lawful to use such seines, nets, and chemicals in an oxbow lake. For purposes of this Code section, an “oxbow lake” means a lake formed in an abandoned river channel which has become separated from the main stream by a natural change in the river.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-705, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 49; Ga. L. 1986, p. 169, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1487, § 1/HB 301; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 3/HB 869; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72; Ga. L. 2021, p. 105, § 2-5/HB 362.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in the first sentence of subsection (c).

The 2021 amendment,

effective April 27, 2021, in the middle of the second sentence of subsection (a), inserted “minnow” and inserted “and minnow traps”.

27-4-6.
Use of minnow seines or traps.

It shall be unlawful to take any game fish or American eels by minnow seines or minnow traps from the fresh waters of this state. It shall also be unlawful to take any nongame fish by minnow seines or minnow traps from any of the fresh waters of this state, except where such fish are five inches in length or less and are not to be sold or otherwise used for commercial purposes and except where such waters are not trout waters as designated pursuant to Code Section 27-4-51. It shall further be unlawful for any person to engage in the use of minnow seines or minnow traps to collect nongame fish in the fresh waters of this state without a valid resident or nonresident fishing license as provided in Code Section 27-2-23. In accordance with sound principles of wildlife research and management, the department shall have the authority to specify open seasons, creel and possession limits, gear specifications, species taken, and waters open to the use of minnow seines and minnow traps in accordance with this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 231, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 120, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 25; Code 1933, § 45-708, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 27; Ga. L. 2021, p. 105, § 2-6/HB 362.

The 2021 amendment,

effective April 27, 2021, inserted “or minnow traps” in the first and second sentences, and substituted the present provisions of the third and fourth sentences for the former provisions, which read: “It shall also be unlawful to use a seine which is longer than 20 feet or which has a mesh larger than three-eighths of an inch square, or in diameter if the mesh is not square. All game fish and American eels taken in such seines shall be immediately released unharmed into the waters from which they were taken.”

27-4-7.
Use of gill nets; seizure of illegal nets.

Except as otherwise provided by law or rule and regulation, it shall be unlawful for any person to use a gill net in any of the fresh waters or salt waters of this state at any time, provided that it shall be lawful for properly licensed fishermen to use such nets in the taking of shad in accordance with Code Section 27-4-71 and all other laws and rules and regulations applicable to the taking of shad. All nets violative of this Code section found in the fresh waters or salt waters of this state or in the possession of any person on or around fresh water or salt water shall be seized by game wardens or other peace officers of this state. Nets so seized shall be confiscated and shall become the property of the department and shall be disposed of as the commissioner shall direct.

Except for shad taken in accordance with Code Section 27-4-71, it shall be unlawful to land in this state any of the species of fish enumerated in Code Section 27-4-10 which were taken by means of a gill net. For purposes of this subsection, “to land” fish means to bring the fish to shore in this state in the boat or vessel utilized in taking the fish by means of a gill net, regardless of the jurisdiction from which the fish were taken.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 93, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 45-712, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1290, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 4/HB 869; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game wardens” for “conservation rangers” near the end of the second sentence of subsection (a).

27-4-8.
Unlawful devices or substances.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use any firearm, battery, generator or other similar device or any dynamite, explosives, or destructive substances, including poisons, walnut hulls, and lime, for the purpose of catching, killing, taking, or harming fish. The possession of any of the foregoing devices or substances, except firearms, in any boat on the fresh waters of this state shall be deemed prima-facie evidence of guilt under this Code section; provided, however, this provision shall not apply to batteries used to operate motors or lights.

History.

Ga. L. 1862-63, p. 46, § 1; Code 1868, § 4533; Code 1873, § 4624; Code 1882, § 4624; Penal Code 1895, § 723; Ga. L. 1899, p. 68, § 1; Ga. L. 1903, p. 100, §§ 5, 8; Penal Code 1910, §§ 611, 774; Ga. L. 1925, p. 306, §§ 16, 17; Code 1933, §§ 45-507, 45-508, 45-509; Ga. L. 1952, p. 236, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 181, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, §§ 83, 84; Code 1933, § 45-711, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Public Rights in Georgia’s Tidelands,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 79 (1974).

27-4-9.
Possession of nets or other devices for taking shad during closed season deemed evidence of violation.

The possession, in any boat upon the waters of this state, of nets or other devices capable of taking shad during such time as laws or regulations prohibit the taking of such fish shall be prima-facie evidence that the person having such nets or equipment in his possession is guilty of taking shad in violation of the wildlife laws, rules, and regulations.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-710, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-4-10.
Creel and possession limits; size restrictions.

It shall be unlawful to take in one day or to possess at any one time, except at a commercial storage facility or at one’s place of abode, more than the creel and possession limits established by the board for that fish species; provided, however, that it shall be illegal to possess more than a total of 50 individuals of all fresh water species named in this Code section. It shall be unlawful to take from the waters of this state or to possess any fish species larger or smaller or in numbers greater than the limits established by the board in accordance with this Code section. The board shall establish creel and possession limits which shall be no greater than the following limits and shall establish sizes of fish species within the following ranges which may not be taken:

Click to view

In accordance with sound principles of wildlife research and management, the board shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations establishing size limits, open seasons, creel and possession limits, and possession and landing specifications on a state-wide, regional, or local basis in accordance with this Code section. The board is further authorized to designate certain areas as catch and release fishing areas and to promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the management of such areas for catch and release fishing.

Species Ranges of Sizes Within Which Fish May Not Be Taken Maximum Daily Creel And Possession Limit (1) Genus micropterus (black bass) 0 — 24 inches 10 (2) Mountain trout 0 — 24 inches 8 (3) White bass 0 — 36 inches 15 (4) Striped bass 0 — 36 inches 15 (5) Striped white bass hybrids 0 — 36 inches 15 (6) Any one or combination of the species of bream or sunfish 0 — 10 inches 50 (7) Walleye 0 — 24 inches 15 (8) Sauger 0 — 24 inches 15 (9) Chain pickerel 0 — 24 inches 15 (10) Grass pickerel 0 — 12 inches 15 (11) Redfin pickerel 0 — 12 inches 15 (12) Black crappie 0 — 14 inches 30 (13) White crappie 0 — 14 inches 30 (14) American shad 0 — 30 inches 8 (15) Hickory shad 0 — 24 inches 8 (16) Amberjack 0 — 50 inches 5 (17) Atlantic croaker 0 — 10 inches 25 (18) Atlantic sturgeon 0 — 86 inches 1 (19) Black drum 0 — 36 inches 15 (20) Black sea bass 0 — 15 inches 15 (21) Blue marlin 3 (22) Bluefish 0 — 20 inches 15 (23) Cobia 0 — 40 inches 5 (24) Dolphin 0 — 24 inches 15 (25) Flounder (Paralicthys spp.) 0 — 15 inches 15 (26) Gag grouper 0 — 25 inches 5 (27) King mackerel 0 — 36 inches 5 (28) Red drum 0 — 36 inches 5 (29) Red porgy 0 — 20 inches 10 (30) Red snapper 0 — 25 inches 5 (31) Sailfish 3 (32) Sand tiger shark 0 — 140 inches 1 (33) Sharks 0 — 120 inches 2 (34) Sheepshead 0 — 20 inches 15 (35) Small sharks composite (Atlantic sharpnose, bonnethead, and spiny dogfish) 0 — 54 inches 4 (36) Spanish mackerel 0 — 20 inches 20 (37) Spot 0 — 10 inches 25 (38) Spotted sea trout 0 — 25 inches 15 (39) Tarpon 0 — 90 inches 1 (40) Tripletail 0 — 25 inches 5 (41) Weakfish 0 — 15 inches 15 (42) White marlin 3

History.

Code 1933, § 45-713, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 50; Ga. L. 1986, p. 504, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 552, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1552, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 762, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 27; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1636, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 543, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 980, § 4; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 5/HB 869; Ga. L. 2021, p. 105, § 2-7/HB 362; Ga. L. 2022, p. 308, § 5/HB 1233.

The 2021 amendment,

effective April 27, 2021, substituted “Genus micropterus (black bass)” for “Largemouth bass” in paragraph (a)(1).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the table in subsection (a), deleted former items (2) through (6), relating to Smallmouth bass, Shoal bass, Suwannee bass, Spotted bass or Kentucky bass, and Redeye bass or Coosa bass, and redesignated former items (7) through (47) as present items (2) through (42), respectively.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2021, an inch symbol was deleted following “10” in paragraph (a)(1).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Creel and possession limits, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Wildlife Resources Division, Fishing Regulations, § 391-4-3-.05.

27-4-11.
Fishing in department fish hatcheries.

It shall be unlawful to fish in ponds or other waters of fish hatcheries owned or operated by the department, except for those waters which the department opens for fishing. The department may set special creel limits, hours, open dates, age limitations, and other conditions for fishing in the ponds or other waters at each facility.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-714, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 2004, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 13; Ga. L. 1986, p. 504, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 541, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1552, § 5; Ga. L. 1990, p. 762, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 980, § 5.

27-4-11.1.
Possession of firearms and intoxication on public fishing areas; fishing in closed fishing areas; other restrictions in public fishing areas.

It shall be unlawful for any person on any public fishing area owned or operated by the department:

To possess a firearm other than a handgun, as such term is defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1, during a closed hunting season for that area unless such firearm is unloaded and stored in a motor vehicle so as not to be readily accessible or to possess a handgun during a closed hunting season for that area unless such person is a lawful weapons carrier as defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1;

To possess a loaded firearm other than a handgun, as such term is defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1, in a motor vehicle during a legal open hunting season for that area or to possess a loaded handgun in a motor vehicle during a legal open hunting season for that area unless such person is a lawful weapons carrier as defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1; or

To be under the influence of drugs, intoxicating liquors, beers, or wines. The determination of whether any person is under the influence of drugs or intoxicating liquors, beers, or wines may be made in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3 of this title relating to hunting while under the influence of drugs or alcohol.

It shall be unlawful for any person to fish at any time in any pond or lake on a public fishing area owned or operated by the department which has been posted “closed” by the department for purposes of fisheries management or to take or possess any species or any size of any species or to exceed the creel limit of any species at any time from any pond or lake on a public fishing area which has been posted with a sign which states that that species or size may not be taken or that creel limit exceeded. Creel and size limits posted as permissible must be within the limits set forth in Code Section 27-4-10 and, if applicable, the limits set by the board pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section.

It shall be unlawful for any person to take in one day or to possess at any one time any number of fish caught from public fishing areas except in compliance with limits set by rule and regulation of the board, which limits shall not be more than the maximum limit for that species set forth in Code Section 27-4-10.

It shall be unlawful for any person to fish or to be present on any public fishing area except in accordance with rules and regulations established by the board for the use of such area. The board shall have the authority to adopt rules and regulations governing methods of fishing; to regulate the operation and use of vessels; to close the area or certain ponds or lakes of the area to vessels; and to regulate other matters that the board deems necessary for the safe operation and sound management of the area.

It shall be unlawful on any public fishing area for any person to drive or otherwise operate a vehicle on any road posted “closed” to vehicular access, to drive around a closed gate or cable blocking a road, or to drive on any road that is not improved in that it is not receiving maintenance for the purpose of vehicular access. It shall be unlawful for any person to park a vehicle at any place within a public fishing area, including upon the right of way of any county, state, or federal highway which traverses the public fishing area, where signs placed at the direction of the commissioner or his or her designee prohibit parking.

It shall be unlawful for any person to camp anywhere on any public fishing area except in those areas designated by appropriate signs as camping areas.

It shall be unlawful for persons under 14 years of age to enter or remain upon any public fishing area unless such person is under adult supervision. It shall be unlawful for any person to cause or knowingly to permit his or her ward who is under 14 years of age to enter or remain upon any public fishing area unless such child or ward is under adult supervision.

It shall be unlawful for any person who has fished at a public fishing area to refuse to allow department personnel to count, measure, and weigh his or her catch.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1380, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 10; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1552, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1636, §§ 3-5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 27; Ga. L. 1996, p. 980, § 6; Ga. L. 2010, p. 963, § 2-15/SB 308; Ga. L. 2022, p. 74, § 16/SB 319.

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 12, 2022, substituted “is a lawful weapons carrier as defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1” for “possesses a valid weapons carry license issued pursuant to Code Section 16-11-129” at the end of paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “right of way” was substituted for “right-of-way” in the second sentence of subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 963, § 3-1/SB 308, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to all offenses committed on and after June 4, 2010, and shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before June 4, 2010, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 74, § 1/SB 319, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Chairman John Meadows Act.’”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 74, § 2/SB 319, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and determines that:

“(1) The Second Amendment to the United States Constitution recognizes the right of the people to keep and bear arms and that such right shall not be infringed; and

“(2) The people of this state, to perpetuate the principles of free government, insure justice to all, preserve peace, promote the interest and happiness of the citizen and of the family, and transmit to posterity the enjoyment of liberty, provided that the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed but that the General Assembly shall have power to prescribe the manner in which arms may be borne.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Crimes and Offenses,” see 27 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 131 (2011).

27-4-12.
Adoption of rules and regulations by board; reporting; legislative overruling of rules and regulations.

In accordance with current, sound principles of wildlife research and management, the board shall have the authority to adopt rules and regulations establishing seasons; methods of fishing and disposition; size, possession, and creel limits; and gear and landing specifications for the taking of fish from the fresh waters and salt waters of this state, except to the extent that such matters are specifically provided for by this title.

Within the first ten days of a subsequent legislative session, the board shall report to the appropriate standing committees of each house and to all members whose districts are included within current boundaries of the First Congressional District the following information for the previous year:

A listing and description of rules promulgated by the board for salt-water species listed in Code Section 27-4-10; and

A listing and description of any findings made by the department in making a determination pursuant to Code Section 27-4-130.

The General Assembly may override any rule or regulation promulgated by the board affecting salt-water finfish fisheries after January 1, 2013, by adopting a joint resolution of the General Assembly so stating, the provisions of Code Section 50-13-4 notwithstanding.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-732, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-733, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1380, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 6/HB 869.

27-4-13.
[Repealed] Size and construction requirements of cast nets.

History.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 1133, § 4; repealed by Ga. L. 2007, p. 93, § 3, effective July 1, 2007.